test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_C_zhiishiib_gt-glossing.yaml
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: nzhiishiibenyminaa
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: nzhiishiibensminaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: gzhiishiibenyminaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl: gzhiishiibenymiwaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: gzhiishiibensminaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl: gzhiishiibensmiwaa
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4: zhiishiibenymini
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4: zhiishiibensmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: nzhiishiibenymiba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibenymidig
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: nzhiishiibensmiba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibensmidig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: gzhiishiibenymiba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibenymidig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: gzhiishiibensmiba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibensmidig
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: zhiishiibenymiba
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibenymidig
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: zhiishiibensmiba
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibensmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: nzhiishiibenyman
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: nzhiishiibenyming
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: nzhiishiibenymag
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: nzhiishiibensman
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: nzhiishiibensming
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: nzhiishiibensmag
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: gzhiishiibenyman
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: gzhiishiibenyming
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: gzhiishiibenymag
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: gzhiishiibensman
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: gzhiishiibensming
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: gzhiishiibensmag
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: zhiishiibenyman
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: zhiishiibenyming
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: zhiishiibensman
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: zhiishiibensming
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: zhiishiibenyman
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: zhiishiibenyming
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: zhiishiibenymag
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: zhiishiibensman
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: zhiishiibensming
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: zhiishiibensmag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: nzhiishiibenyshinaa
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: nzhiishiibensshinaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: gzhiishiibenyshinaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl: gzhiishiibenyshiwaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: gzhiishiibensshinaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl: gzhiishiibensshiwaa
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+3+4: zhiishiibenyshini
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4: zhiishiibensshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: nzhiishiibenyshiba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibenyshidig
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: nzhiishiibensshiba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibensshidig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: gzhiishiibenyshiba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibenyshidig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: gzhiishiibensshiba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibensshidig
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: zhiishiibenyshiba
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibenyshidig
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: zhiishiibensshiba
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibensshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+4: nzhiishiibenyshan
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: nzhiishiibenyshing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: nzhiishiibenyshag
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+4: nzhiishiibensshan
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: nzhiishiibensshing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: nzhiishiibensshag
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+4: gzhiishiibenyshan
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: gzhiishiibenyshing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: gzhiishiibenyshag
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+4: gzhiishiibensshan
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: gzhiishiibensshing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: gzhiishiibensshag
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+4: zhiishiibenyshan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: zhiishiibenyshing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+4: zhiishiibensshan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: zhiishiibensshing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+4: zhiishiibenyshan
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: zhiishiibenyshing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: zhiishiibenyshag
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+4: zhiishiibensshan
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: zhiishiibensshing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: zhiishiibensshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: nzhiishiibenynaanba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibenynaandig
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: nzhiishiibensnaanba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibensnaandig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibenynaanba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibenynaandig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibenywaaba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibenywaadig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibensnaanba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibensnaandig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibenswaaba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibenswaadig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+3+4+Prt: zhiishiibenyniwba
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt: zhiishiibensniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: nzhiishiibenynaanin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: nzhiishiibenynaaning
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: nzhiishiibenynaanig
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: nzhiishiibensnaanin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: nzhiishiibensnaaning
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: nzhiishiibensnaanig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: gzhiishiibenynaanin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: gzhiishiibenynaaning
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: gzhiishiibenynaanig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: gzhiishiibenywaan
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: gzhiishiibenywaang
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+2+Pl+Pl: gzhiishiibenywaag
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: gzhiishiibensnaanin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: gzhiishiibensnaaning
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: gzhiishiibensnaanig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: gzhiishiibenswaan
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: gzhiishiibenswaang
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Pl: gzhiishiibenswaag
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: zhiishiibenywaan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: zhiishiibenywaang
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+3+4+4: zhiishiibenyniwan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+3+4+Loc: zhiishiibenyniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: zhiishiibenswaan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: zhiishiibenswaang
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+3+4+4: zhiishiibensniwan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+3+4+Loc: zhiishiibensniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt+4: nzhiishiibenybaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibenybaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibenybaniig
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt+4: nzhiishiibensbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibensbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibensbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt+4: gzhiishiibenybaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibenybaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibenybaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt+4: gzhiishiibensbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibensbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibensbaniig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt+4: zhiishiibenybaniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenybaniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt+4: zhiishiibensbaniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibensbaniing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt+4: zhiishiibenybaniin
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenybaniing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibenybaniig
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt+4: zhiishiibensbaniin
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibensbaniing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibensbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: nzhiishiibmishnaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gzhiishiibmishnaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gzhiishiibmishwaa
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: zhiishiibmishni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: nzhiishiibmishba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibmishdig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gzhiishiibmishba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibmishdig
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: zhiishiibmishba
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibmishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: nzhiishiibmishan
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: nzhiishiibmishing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: nzhiishiibmishag
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: gzhiishiibmishan
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gzhiishiibmishing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gzhiishiibmishag
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: zhiishiibmishan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: zhiishiibmishing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: zhiishiibmishan
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: zhiishiibmishing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: zhiishiibmishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: nzhiishiibminaanba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibminaandig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibminaanba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibminaandig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibmiwaaba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibmiwaadig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: zhiishiibminwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: nzhiishiibminaanin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: nzhiishiibminaaning
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: nzhiishiibminaanig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gzhiishiibminaanin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gzhiishiibminaaning
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gzhiishiibminaanig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gzhiishiibmiwaan
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gzhiishiibmiwaang
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gzhiishiibmiwaag
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: zhiishiibmiwaan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: zhiishiibmiwaang
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+3+4+4: zhiishiibminwan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: zhiishiibminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: nzhiishiibmibniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibmibniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibmibniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: gzhiishiibmibniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibmibniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibmibniig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: zhiishiibmibniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibmibniing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: zhiishiibmibniin
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibmibniing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibmibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nzhiishiibshinaanba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibshinaandig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibshinaanba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibshinaandig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibshiwaaba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibshiwaadig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt: zhiishiibshinwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: nzhiishiibshinaanin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nzhiishiibshinaaning
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nzhiishiibshinaanig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: gzhiishiibshinaanin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gzhiishiibshinaaning
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gzhiishiibshinaanig
